Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.170

Contracts voidable—When.

If a student or prospective student is a resident of this state at the time any contract relating to payment for education or any note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness relating thereto is entered into, RCW 28C.10.180 shall govern the rights of the parties to the contract or evidence of indebtedness. If a contract or evidence of indebtedness contains any of the following agreements, the contract is voidable at the option of the student or prospective student:

(1) That the law of another state shall apply;

(2) That the maker or any person liable on the contract or evidence of indebtedness consents to the jurisdiction of another state;

(3) That another person is authorized to confess judgment on the contract or evidence of indebtedness; or

(4) That fixes venue.

[ 1986 c 299 s 17.]